Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act

§ 17-7-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 185, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 75, § 1, related to definitions and uniformity of construction for the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act.

§ 17-7-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 185, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 75, § 1, related to use of appreciation of endowment fund.

§ 17-7-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 185, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 75, § 1, related to authority to invest institutional fund.

§ 17-7-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 185, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 75, § 1, related to standard of conduct for management of institutional funds.

§ 17-7-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 185, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 75, § 1, related to release of restrictions.